Utah, session 2026, HB585.
Section 1. Section 54-27-101 is enacted to read:27. Data Center Energy Reporting1. General Provisions54-27-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Large data center" means a facility that:(a)houses networked server computers in one physical location to disseminate, manage, and store data and information as the primary service of the facility; and(b)has a peak electrical demand of 10 megawatts or more.(2)"Operator" means the owner or operator of a large data center, or other person who has comparable rights of use over a large data center.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 54-27-201 is enacted to read:2. Reporting Requirements54-27-201. Reporting by large data centers.(1)Beginning January 1, 2027, at least 90 days before the operator begins construction of a large data center, the operator shall report to the electrical corporation in whose service territory the large data center will be located:(a)the municipality and county where the large data center will be located;(b)the projected peak electrical demand in megawatts;(c)the projected annual electrical energy consumption in megawatt hours;(d)the projected source of electrical energy, including the percentage expected from the electrical corporation and the percentage self-generated;(e)if self-generated, the type of generation facility and fuel source; and(f)the projected date of commencement of operations.(2)Beginning January 1, 2027, for a large data center in operation, the operator shall report annually by March 1 to the electrical corporation in whose service territory the large data center is located:(a)the actual peak electrical demand in megawatts for the previous calendar year;(b)the actual annual electrical energy consumption in megawatt hours for the previous calendar year;(c)the actual source of electrical energy for the previous calendar year, including the percentage supplied by the electrical corporation and the percentage self-generated; and(d)if self-generated, the type of generation facility and fuel source.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 54-27-202 is enacted to read:54-27-202. Reporting by electrical corporations.An electrical corporation shall report to the commission by April 15 of each year aggregated information for all large data centers that reported under Section 54-27-201, including:(1)the total number of large data centers that began construction during the previous calendar year;(2)the total number of large data centers in operation during the previous calendar year;(3)the average annual electrical energy consumption per large data center in megawatt hours;(4)the total peak electrical demand of all large data centers in megawatts;(5)the total annual electrical energy consumption of all large data centers in megawatt hours; and(6)the percentage of total electrical energy supplied by the electrical corporation to large data centers versus self-generated.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 54-27-301 is enacted to read:54-27-301. Commission report.Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the commission shall provide an annual report by July 1 to the Public Utilities, Energy, and Technology Interim Committee, regarding:(1)aggregated energy use data reported under Section 54-27-202; and(2)analysis of trends in data center energy consumption and impact on the state's electrical grid.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.